Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 1 General Provisions
52-7-14.
Collisions, accidents, and casualties; salvage rights.

Duty to render assistance and identify vessel and self. It shall be the duty of the operator of a vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty, so far as he can do so without serious danger to his own vessel, crew, and passengers, to render to other persons affected by the collision, accident, or other casualty such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, accident, or other casualty and also to give his name, address, and identification of his vessel in writing to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, accident, or other casualty.

Good Samaritan clause. Any person complying with subsection (a) of this Code section who gratuitously and in good faith renders assistance at the scene of a vessel collision, accident, or other casualty without the objection of any person assisted, shall not be held liable for any civil damages as a result of the rendering of assistance or for any act of assistance in providing or arranging salvage towage, medical treatment, or other assistance if the assisting person acts as a reasonably prudent man would have acted under the same or similar circumstances.

Accident reports required.

All boating accidents must be reported to the department within 48 hours of the accident if:

A person dies within 24 hours as a result of the accident;

A person is disabled for more than 24 hours;

A person requires medical treatment for injuries;

A person disappears from a vessel.

Reports of reportable boating accidents must be made within five days if not earlier required by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Accident reports must be on forms supplied by the department, which must be filled out in their entirety and dated and signed by the person submitting the report. Such reports shall be filed by the operator or, if no operator, by the owner of any vessel involved in the boating accident. If the operator or owner is incapable of making the report, the investigating officer shall submit the report. Reports must contain at a minimum the following information:

The name, address, and telephone number of each operator of each vessel involved;

The number and name of each vessel involved;

The name, address, and telephone number of each owner of each vessel involved;

The name of the nearest city or town, the county, the state, and the body of water on which the accident occurred;

The location of the accident on the water;

The time and date of the accident;

Visibility, weather, and water conditions;

The age, date of birth, vessel operating experience, and boat safety training of the operator making the report;

The number of persons on board or towed on skis by each vessel;

The name, address, and date of birth of each person fatally injured;

The cause of death of each;

The name and address of each owner of property, other than vessels or boats, involved;

The availability and use of personal flotation devices;

The type of fire extinguisher used;

The nature and extent of each injury resulting from the accident;

A description of all property and vessel damage within an estimated cost of repairs;

A description of any equipment failures that caused or contributed to the accident;

A description of the accident;

An opinion of the cause of the accident; and

The make, model, type, hull identification number, beam width, length, horsepower and type of motor, and hull material of the reporting operator’s vessel, and the year it was built.

As used in this paragraph, the term “medical facility” means any licensed general or specialized hospital, institutional infirmary, public health center, or diagnostic and treatment center. The term also includes, without being limited to, any building or facility, not under the operation or control of a hospital, which is primarily devoted to the provision of surgical treatment to patients not requiring hospitalization and which is classified by the Department of Community Health as an ambulatory surgical treatment center.

Any:

Physician, including any doctor of medicine licensed to practice under the laws of this state;

Licensed registered nurse employed by a medical facility;

Security personnel employed by a medical facility; or

Other personnel employed by a medical facility whose employment duties involve the care and treatment of patients therein

having cause to believe that a patient has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her as a result of a reportable boating accident shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with this paragraph.

An oral report shall be made immediately by telephone or otherwise and shall be followed by a report in writing, if requested, to the person in charge of the medical facility or his or her designated delegate. The person in charge of the medical facility or his or her designated delegate shall then notify the local law enforcement agency having primary jurisdiction in the area in which the medical facility is located of the contents of the report. The report shall contain the name and address of the patient, the nature and extent of the patient’s injuries, and any other information that the reporting person believes might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injuries and the identity of the perpetrator.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, copies of medical records relating to the treatment of such patient shall be furnished to the investigatory law enforcement officer of the department, or any local, state, or federal law enforcement agency upon receipt of a written request or subpoena issued by such law enforcement agency or the prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction over such accident. Such medical records shall be handled in a manner which assures the confidentiality of such records.

Any person or persons participating in the making of a report or causing a report to be made to the appropriate police authority pursuant to this paragraph or participating in any judicial proceeding or any other proceeding resulting therefrom shall in so doing be immune from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed, providing such participation pursuant to this paragraph shall be in good faith.

Salvage rights. Any person who fails to salvage any vessel within 12 months after its sinking shall forfeit his ownership to the vessel and thereafter any person may salvage and claim the vessel.

Official authority. Any officer empowered to enforce this article shall have the authority to stop, board, and detain any vessel involved in a reportable boating accident and to continue the detention of such vessel if necessary for evidentiary purposes for such reasonable period of time as such necessity continues.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 8; Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 12; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, § 9; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1743, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 679, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-39/SB 433; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 52/HB 1428.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added “and” at the end of subparagraph (c)(3)(S).

Cross references.

Limitation of liability of persons rendering emergency care at scene of accident or emergency generally, §

51-1-29

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a comma was added following “state” in the first sentence of subparagraph (c)(4)(D).

U.S. Code.

Marine casualty reporting systems,

46 U.S.C. § 6101

et seq.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Good Samaritan Laws — Legal Disarray: An Update,” see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 1439 (1987).

52-7-15.
Furnishing information to federal officials and agencies.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the department pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 52-7-14 shall be transmitted to such official or agency of the United States for analytical and statistical purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 9; Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 13.

52-7-16.
Towing persons on water skis, aquaplanes, surfboards or similar device.

No person shall operate a vessel on any of the waters of this state for towing a person or persons on water skis, aquaplane, surfboard, or any similar device unless the vessel is equipped with a wide-angle mirror mounted in such a manner as to permit the operator of the vessel to observe at all times the person or persons being towed or unless there is in such vessel a competent person, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe at all times the person or persons being towed.

No person shall operate any vessel on any of the waters of this state for towing a person or persons on water skis, aquaplane, surfboard, or similar devices nor shall any person or persons engage in water skiing, aquaplaning, surfboarding, or similar activities unless such person or persons being towed are wearing a ski belt, ski jacket, or a Type I, II, or III United States Coast Guard approved personal flotation device.

No person shall operate a vessel on any waters of this state towing a person or persons on water skis, aquaplane, surfboard, or similar devices nor shall any person engage in water skiing, aquaplaning, surfboarding, or similar activity at any time between the hours from sunset to sunrise.

Subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person or persons engaged in an activity authorized under Code Section 52-7-19.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 10; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 14; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1743, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 52.

52-7-17.
Speed and load restrictions; riding of bow or gunwale of vessel.

The speed of each vessel shall at all times be regulated so as to avoid danger or injury or damage or unnecessary inconvenience, directly or by the effect of the wash or wave raised by the vessel, while in the vicinity of swimming areas, docks, floating boat houses, moored boats, or boats engaged in fishing activities.

No vessel shall be loaded beyond the recommended capacity.

No person operating any vessel shall allow any person or persons to ride the bow or gunwale of any vessel nor shall any person or persons ride on the bow or gunwale of any vessel unless the vessel is equipped with a railing or some other retaining device on the bow or gunwale, so located that any person or persons might hold to such railing or other retaining device to avoid falling or being thrown overboard. For the purposes of this Code section, eyes or cleats shall not be considered retaining devices.

No vessel shall be operated at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions, and such vessel’s operator shall have regard for the actual and potential hazards then existing.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 10; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 15; Ga. L. 1998, p. 679, § 5.

52-7-18.
Rules of the road for boat traffic.

All vessels operating on the coastal waters of this state shall conform to the “Steering and Sailing Rules” established by Section II, Rules 11 through 18, of the International Navigation Rules Act of 1977, as amended.

All vessels operating on the inland waters of this state shall conform to the “Steering and Sailing Rules” established by Subpart II, Rules 11 through 18, of the Inland Navigation Rules Act of 1980, as amended.

It shall be the duty of each operator to keep his vessel to the starboard or right side of the center of any channel, stream, or other narrow body of water; provided, however, this provision shall not give to the operator of a sailing vessel the right to hamper, in a narrow channel, the safe passage of another vessel which can navigate only inside that channel.

Powered vessels approaching nonpowered vessels shall reduce their speed so that their wake shall not endanger the life or property of those occupying the nonpowered vessel.

Whenever a vessel approaches a bend, point, or other blind area, it shall be the duty of the operator to:

Move as far to the right or starboard as possible;

Reduce speed to allow for an unexpected stop if necessary; and

Sound a blast of eight to ten seconds’ duration on a sounding device if such a device is carried.

No person shall operate any vessel or tow a person or persons on water skis, an aquaplane, a surfboard, or any similar device on the waters of this state at a speed greater than idle speed within 100 feet of any vessel which is moored, anchored, or adrift outside normal traffic channels, or any wharf, dock, pier, piling, bridge structure or abutment, person in the water, or shoreline adjacent to a full-time or part-time residence, public park, public beach, public swimming area, marina, restaurant, or other public use area. This subsection shall not be interpreted to prohibit any person from initiating or terminating water skiing from any wharf, dock, or pier owned by such person or used by such person with the permission of the owner of said wharf, dock, or pier nor shall it be interpreted to prohibit the immediate return of a tow vessel to a downed water skier.

No vessel shall run around or within 100 feet of another vessel at a speed greater than idle speed unless such vessel is overtaking or meeting such other vessel in compliance with the rules of the road for vessel traffic.

No vessel shall be operated in such a manner as to ride or jump the wake of another vessel within 100 feet of such other vessel unless the vessel is overtaking or meeting such other vessel in compliance with the rules of the road for vessel traffic and, having passed or overtaken such other vessel, the operator of the passing or overtaking vessel shall not change or reverse course for the purpose of riding or jumping the wake of such other vessel within 100 feet of such other vessel.

Subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this Code section shall not apply to ocean-going ships or to tugboats or other powered vessels which are assisting ocean-going ships during transit or during docking or undocking maneuvers.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1632, § 8; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, § 10; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 679, § 6.

Cross references.

Liability of owner of watercraft for tort caused by operation of watercraft, §§

51-1-21

,

51-1-22

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “water skiing” was substituted for “waterskiing” in the second sentence of subsection (f).

52-7-19.
Regattas, boat races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions.

The department may regulate the holding of regattas, boat races, marine parades, tournaments, or exhibitions which by their nature, circumstance, or location will introduce extra or unusual hazards to the safety or lives of participants or observers or will subject the water and adjoining upland resource upon which the event will be held to extra or unusual stress from pollution, litter, or overuse. The board may adopt and may from time to time amend regulations concerning the safety of vessels and persons thereon, either observers or participants, and the protection of the water and adjoining upland resources of this state. Whenever a regatta, boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition is proposed to be held, the person in charge thereof shall, at least 30 days prior thereto, file an application with the department for permission to hold such regatta, race, parade, tournament, or exhibition. The application shall set forth the date, time, and location proposed for holding such regatta, race, parade, tournament, or exhibition and such other information as the department may require. It shall be unlawful to conduct such regatta, race, parade, tournament, or exhibition without authorization of the department.

Any person sponsoring an event requiring a permit under this Code section and which is anticipated to attract 10,000 or more participants shall provide to the department an indemnity bond issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state in the amount of $50,000.00 or such lesser amount as determined appropriate by the commissioner in his discretion under criteria set forth in regulations adopted by the board. The bond shall be payable to the department and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements set forth in this Code section, the regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section, and the conditions of the permit issued under this Code section.

Upon the failure or refusal of the sponsor to comply with any requirement of this Code section, the regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section, or the conditions of a permit issued under this Code section, which failure results in damage to the department or to this state, the commissioner may make demand upon the sponsor and the surety for such portion of the face amount of the bond as he determines is necessary to compensate the department or the state for all damages suffered. Upon refusal or failure of the sponsor or surety to pay over the sum demanded, he shall initiate an action at law to recover the sum.

Upon recovery of the sum, the department is authorized to reimburse itself for any expenses incurred in connection with the cleanup and minimization of damage to natural resources, to expend such sum to clean up and minimize the damage, or both.

Any person sponsoring an event requiring a permit under this Code section and which is anticipated to attract 10,000 or more participants and spectators shall also provide a forfeiture bond issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state in the amount of $50,000.00 or such lesser amount as determined appropriate by the commissioner in his discretion under criteria set forth in regulations by the board. The bond shall be payable to the department and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements set forth in this Code section, the regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section, and the conditions of the permit issued under this Code section.

Upon the failure or refusal of the sponsor to comply with any requirement of this Code section, the regulations promulgated pursuant to this Code section, or the conditions of a permit issued under this Code section, the commissioner may make demand upon the sponsor and the surety for the face amount of the bond; provided, however, that the commissioner may, in his discretion and in accordance with regulations adopted by the board, make demand for an amount less than the face amount. In exercising such discretion, he may consider the seriousness and degree of the noncompliance. Upon refusal or failure of the sponsor or surety to pay over the sum demanded, he shall initiate an action at law to recover the sum.

Upon recovery of the sum, it shall be paid into the state treasury.

The commissioner may in the exercise of his discretion deny an application for a permit for a proposed marine event when, having considered the number of participants and spectators likely to be attracted to the event, the nature and purpose of the event, and the area in which it would be held, he determines that:

The ability of the sponsor to enlist a sufficient number of authorized peace officers to enforce, during the course of the marine event, the applicable state laws and the conditions of the marine event permit issued therefor and to control properly the number of participants is inadequate under the circumstances;

The conduct of the event will subject the waters upon which the event will be held or the adjoining upland resource to such extraordinary stress from pollution or damage due to overuse or create such extraordinary hazards to the safety or lives of participants or spectators that such pollution or damage or such safety hazards cannot be successfully prevented or mitigated by permit conditions; or

The financial and manpower costs incurred by public agencies in the regulation of the marine event are greater than the recreational benefits likely to accrue to the general public from the conduct of the event.

Any peace officer, including law enforcement personnel of the department, assigned to duty assisting in the supervision of any event permitted under this Code section may enforce any of the criminal laws of this state in connection with such assignment.

This Code section shall not exempt any person from compliance with applicable federal laws or regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 16; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, § 11; Ga. L. 1981, p. 987, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 52.

Cross references.

Powers of Department of Community Health with regard to control of mass gatherings, T. 31, C. 27.

52-7-20.
Operation of vessels in vicinity of regulatory markers and aids to navigation; tampering with regulatory markers and aids to navigation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Aids to navigation” means buoys, beacons, or other fixed objects in the water which are used to mark obstructions to navigation or to direct navigation through safe channels.

“Regulatory markers” means any anchored or fixed marker in or on the water or any sign on the shore or on a bridge over the water other than aids to navigation and shall include, but not be limited to, bathing markers, speed zone markers, information markers, danger zone markers, boat keep-out area markers, and mooring buoys.

It shall be unlawful to operate a power boat, except at an idle speed, or to create a wake in the vicinity of those marinas, bridges, public access ramps, and blind points which are identified by appropriate signs and markers which conform to the system of aids to navigation prescribed by the United States Coast Guard and to the system of uniform waterway markers approved by the Advisory Panel of State Officials to the Merchant Marine Council or on any portion of the Chattahoochee River between the Morgan Falls Dam and the Georgia Highway 400 bridge which the department so marks as being so restricted.

It shall be unlawful to tow a person on water skis, aquaplanes, surfboards, or any similar device or to manipulate any such device on any public waters of the state which the commissioner has designated as a hazardous area or on the Chattahoochee River between the Morgan Falls Dam and the Georgia Highway 400 bridge in any area identified by regulatory markers as a no ski area.

The commissioner is authorized to regulate and restrict vessel operation and other recreational water related activities on the public waters of the state. The Department of Natural Resources is authorized to place or designate the placement of signs and markers so as to identify the areas restricted by this Code section.

No city, county, or individual may attempt to regulate the public waters of this state by use of the above-mentioned signs and markers without the express written permission of the commissioner of natural resources.

The operation of any vessel within prohibited areas that are marked shall be prima-facie evidence of negligent operation.

It shall be unlawful for a person to operate a vessel on the waters of this state in a manner other than that prescribed or permitted by regulatory markers.

No person shall moor or fasten a vessel to or willfully damage, tamper, remove, obstruct, or interfere with any aid to navigation or regulatory marker established pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 10; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 17; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, §§ 12, 13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1993, p. 351, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1273, § 2.

52-7-21.
Local regulations concerning operation, equipment, numbering, and other matters relating to vessels.

This article and other applicable laws of this state shall govern the operation, equipment, and numbering of vessels and all other matters relating thereto, whenever any vessel shall be operated on the waters of this state or when any activity regulated by this article shall take place thereon; but nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the adoption of any ordinance or local law relating to operation and equipment of vessels, the provisions of which are identical to the provisions of this article, amendments thereto, or regulations issued thereunder, provided that such ordinances or local laws shall be operative only so long as and to the extent that they continue to be identical to provisions of this article, amendments thereto, or regulations issued thereunder.

Any political subdivision may at any time, but only after approval by the commissioner upon a showing of necessity because of unusual or special circumstances, adopt any ordinance or local law relating to the operation and equipment of vessels on any waters within its territorial limits which is more stringent than those provided for in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 18; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, § 11.

52-7-22.
Comprehensive boating educational programs; required completion; exception.

The department shall establish a comprehensive boating education program and may seek the cooperation of boatmen, the federal government, and other states. The department may accept moneys made available under federal safety programs and may issue boating certificates to persons who complete courses in boating education.

Effective July 1, 2014, and except as otherwise provided by this chapter, anyone born on or after January 1, 1998, who operates any motorized vessel on the waters of this state shall complete a boating education course approved by the department prior to the operation of such vessel.

A person shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section if he or she is:

Licensed by the United States Coast Guard as a master of a vessel;

Operating such vessel on a private lake or pond; or

A nonresident who has in his or her possession proof that he or she has completed a National Association of State Boating Law Administrators approved boater education course or the equivalency from another state.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 11/SB 136.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 1/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Sections 5, 6, and 11 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Kile Glover Boat Education Law”.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

52-7-23.
Power of Board of Natural Resources to adopt rules and regulations.

The Board of Natural Resources is authorized to adopt any regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this article, including, but not limited to, regulations setting forth the criteria for determining when an indemnity bond shall be required under Code Section 52-7-19 and the appropriate amount of the bond and when a forfeiture bond shall be required under Code Section 52-7-19, the appropriate amount of the bond, and the conditions for default thereunder. In adopting the indemnity bond regulations, the board shall include, without limitation, criteria relating to the expense of restoring the water body and its surrounding area to the state of cleanliness existing before the conduct of an event authorized under Code Section 52-7-19. In adopting the forfeiture bond regulations, the board shall include, without limitation, criteria relating to the magnitude of the event, the water body and surrounding area upon which it will be held, and the potential public safety hazard inherent in the event. The board may, by regulation, establish bond forfeiture conditions for categories of noncompliance, including, but not limited to, failure or refusal to comply with requirements to provide facilities for the convenience of participants and spectators, requirements relating to public safety, and requirements relating to damage to the water body and surrounding area upon which the event was held.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 21; Ga. L. 1981, p. 987, § 2.

52-7-24.
Filing and publication of rules and regulations and amendments thereto.

A copy of the regulations adopted pursuant to this article and of any amendments thereto shall be filed in the office of the department and in the office of the Secretary of State. Rules and regulations shall be published by the department in a convenient form.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 22.

52-7-25.
Enforcement of article.

Any person empowered to enforce this article and any rule or regulation adopted pursuant hereto shall have the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to this article or any such regulation for the purpose of inspection or determining compliance with this article and is empowered to issue a summons for appearance in court or before a magistrate for all violations of this article or of the rules and regulations prescribed hereunder. Vessels of law enforcement personnel shall be marked to identify them as designated enforcement vessels.

An officer empowered to enforce this article shall have the power:

To arrest on view for any violation relating to boating and all rules and regulations prescribed by the board under this article;

To execute all warrants and search warrants for violations of the boat laws and regulations;

To serve subpoenas issued for the examination, investigation, and trial of all offenses against the laws and regulations relating to boats;

To board vessels in use, for purposes of examining any documents and safety equipment, and to search without warrant any vessel which is not at its regular mooring or berth when he believes that any law of this state or any rule or regulation of the Board of Natural Resources relating to boating has been violated;

(4.1)

To board vessels in use or floating, whether moored or not, for purposes of examining any marine toilets, holding tanks, and documents related to them, including records of pump-out and certificates of compliance, and to search without warrant any such vessel to determine compliance with the provisions of this article related to marine toilets when the officer believes that any of said provisions of this article relating to marine toilets have been violated;

To detain the vessel and arrest the operator of a suspected stolen vessel;

To enter upon any land or water in the performance of his duty;

To demand and secure proper assistance in case of emergency;

To exercise the powers and duties of peace officers; and

To investigate any boating accident which occurs on the waters of this state.

Every vessel subject to this article if underway and upon being hailed by a designated law enforcement officer shall stop immediately and lay to or shall maneuver in such a way as to permit the officer to come aboard.

Any person employed or elected by this state or a political subdivision thereof, whose duty it is to preserve the peace or to make arrests or to enforce the law, including, but not limited to, members of the sheriffs’ departments, state patrolmen, and game wardens, are empowered to enforce this article. The Department of Natural Resources shall be primarily responsible for enforcement of this article and the rules and regulations issued under this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to resist or interfere by force, menace, threat, or in any other manner with any arrest for violation of this article. It shall also be unlawful for any person to refuse to go with any law enforcement officer of this state after an arrest has been made or to interfere with the officer in the performance of his duty.

The department is authorized and empowered to identify by appropriate signs and markers those public waters in which certain activities may be prohibited or restricted.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 12; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 23; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, § 12; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, §§ 14-17; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1343, § 4; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (d).

Cross references.

Acceptance of cash bonds for violation of boating laws, §

17-6-5

et seq.

Powers and duties of conservation rangers with regard to laws pertaining to boating safety, §

27-1-20

.

Authority of agents of Georgia Bureau of Investigation to enforce laws relating to operation of vessels or boats upon waters of state, §

27-1-24

.

Law reviews.

For survey article on criminal law and procedure for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (2003).

52-7-26.
Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any person who violates this article or any rule or regulation promulgated hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. For purposes of establishing criminal violations of the rules and regulations promulgated by the board as provided in this article, the term “rules and regulations” means those rules and regulations of the board in force and effect on January 1, 2022.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of Code Section 17-6-12, the release of a person on an unsecured judicial release as provided for in Code Section 17-6-12 for violations under Code Sections 52-7-12, 52-7-12.2, 52-7-12.3, and 52-7-12.4 shall be prohibited.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 12; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 25; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 41; Ga. L. 1995, p. 236, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 29/HB 869; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 12/SB 136; Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 3/HB 783; Ga. L. 2014, p. 624, § 2/HB 777; Ga. L. 2020, p. 570, § 3-4/SB 402; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 3-1/HB 362; Ga. L. 2022, p. 308, § 6/HB 1233.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “an unsecured judicial release as provided for in Code Section 17-6-12” for “his or her own recognizance” in subsection (b).

The 2021 amendment,

effective April 27, 2021, substituted “January 1, 2021” for “January 1, 2014” at the end of subsection (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “January 1, 2022” for “January 1, 2021” at the end of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 5/HB 783, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on May 1, 2014, and shall apply to offenses occurring on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 174: Revising Georgia’s List of Bail Restricted Offenses,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (2021).